Maryland, session 2025, SB0896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–210.
(a) (1) The landlord of any residential rental property shall include in a
written lease or post a sign in a conspicuous place on that property listing the name,
address, and telephone number of:
(i) The landlord; or
(ii) The person, if any, authorized to accept notice or service of
process on behalf of the landlord.
(2) If a landlord fails to comply with paragraph (1) of this subsection, notice
or service of process shall be deemed to be proper if the tenant sends notice or service of
process by any of the following means:
(i) To the person to whom the rent is paid;
(ii) To the address where the rent is paid; or
(iii) To the address where the tax bill is sent.
(b) (1) This subsection applies only in Montgomery County.
– 1 –

Ch. 489 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) In this subsection, “development” has the meaning provided in §
11B–101 of this article.
(3) (i) Before execution by a tenant of a lease for an initial term of 125
days or more, the owner of any residential rental property within any condominium or
development shall provide to the prospective tenant, to the extent applicable, a copy of the
rules, declaration, and recorded covenants and restrictions that limit or affect the use and
occupancy of the property or common areas and to which the owner is obligated.
(ii) The written lease shall include a statement, if applicable, that
the obligations of the owner that limit or affect the use and occupancy of the property are
enforceable against the owner’s tenant.
(C) (1) THE LANDLORD OF ANY RESIDENTIAL RENTAL PROPERTY SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A LINK TO THE PROPERTY’S PET POLICY:
1. ON ON THE PROPERTY’S WEBSITE, IF APPLICABLE;
2. IN ANY DIGITAL ADVERTISEMENT FOR THE
PROPERTY; AND
3. IN ANY INFORMATION PROVIDED FOR A RESIDENTIAL
RENTAL SEARCH ENGINE; AND
(II) PROVIDE A WRITTEN COPY OR SUMMARY OF THE
PROPERTY’S PET POLICY IN ANY RENTAL APPLICATION FORM FOR A UNIT IN THE
PROPERTY.
(2) A PET POLICY PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION
SHALL STATE:
(I) ANY BREED AND WEIGHT RESTRICTIONS;
(II) ANY REQUIRED FEES, INCLUDING:
1. UP–FRONT, NONREFUNDABLE PET FEES;
2. REFUNDABLE PET DEPOSITS; AND
3. MONTHLY PET FEES;
(III) ANY LIMIT ON THE NUMBER OF PETS ALLOWED IN A UNIT;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 489
(IV) ANY VACCINATION REQUIREMENTS;
(V) ANY LIABILITY INSURANCE REQUIREMENTS; AND
(VI) ANY ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS FOR PET OWNERS
IMPOSED BY THE LANDLORD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –